Indiana, session 2026, HB1379.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 2-5-52.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]:
Chapter 52.5. Ground Water and Aquifer Preservation Task
Force
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "task force" refers to the ground
water and aquifer preservation task force established by section 2
of this chapter.
Sec. 2. The ground water and aquifer preservation task force is
established as a temporary task force serving the general assembly.
Sec. 3. (a) The task force consists of the following thirteen (13)
members:
(1) The chair of the senate utilities committee appointed by
the president pro tempore.
(2) The chair of the senate natural resources committee
appointed by the president pro tempore.
(3) One (1) additional member of the senate appointed by the
2026 IN 1379—LS 6276/DI 150


president pro tempore.
(4) The ranking minority member of the senate utilities
committee appointed by the minority leader of the senate.
(5) The ranking minority member of the senate natural
resources committee appointed by the minority leader of the
senate.
(6) The chair of the house utilities, energy and
telecommunications committee appointed by the speaker.
(7) The chair of the house natural resources committee
appointed by the speaker.
(8) One (1) additional member of the house of representatives
appointed by the speaker.
(9) The ranking minority member of the house utilities,
energy and telecommunications committee appointed by the
minority leader of the house of representatives.
(10) The ranking minority member of the house natural
resources committee appointed by the minority leader of the
house of representatives.
(11) One (1) member who has experience in agriculture and
irrigation appointed by the governor.
(12) One (1) member who has experience in economic
development appointed by the governor.
(13) One (1) member who has experience in water
conservation and ground water hydrology or hydrogeology
appointed by the governor.
(b) A member appointed under subsection (a)(11) through
(a)(13) may not be a member of the general assembly.
(c) If a vacancy occurs on the task force, the appointing
authority that appointed the member whose position is vacant shall
appoint an individual to fill the vacancy.
(d) An individual appointed to fill a vacancy must have the
qualifications that the member appointed by the appointing
authority possessed.
(e) An individual appointed to fill a vacancy serves for the
remainder of the term of the member the individual is appointed
to succeed.
Sec. 4. (a) Seven (7) members of the task force constitute a
quorum.
(b) The affirmative vote of a majority of the members of the
task force is necessary for the task force to take official action
other than to meet and take testimony.
(c) The president pro tempore shall appoint one (1) member
2026 IN 1379—LS 6276/DI 150


appointed under section 3(a)(1), 3(a)(2), or 3(a)(3) of this chapter
to serve as a co-chair. The speaker shall appoint one (1) member
appointed under section 3(a)(6), 3(a)(7), or 3(a)(8) of this chapter
to serve as a co-chair. The task force shall meet at the call of the
co-chairs.
Sec. 5. (a) The task force shall meet at least three (3) times in
calendar year 2026, and at least four (4) times in calendar year
2027.
(b) All meetings of the task force are open to the public in
accordance with and subject to IC 5-14-1.5. All records of the task
force are subject to the requirements of IC 5-14-3.
Sec. 6. The task force shall study the following issues:
(1) Ways to protect the public's interest against the potential
for excessive removal of ground water from one (1) part of
Indiana to another, including the criteria that should be
considered and the processes that should be followed before
large amounts of water can be moved.
(2) Strategies to improve ground water monitoring and to
track the supply and demand for water in Indiana and how to
pay for these tracking and monitoring networks.
(3) Whether the state should seek agreements with
neighboring states to protect water resources that cross state
borders.
(4) Whether the existing method of categorizing water users
as significant or nonsignificant is sufficient or whether new
categories of water users should be considered to distinguish
irrigators from major ground water users of the sort
associated with water intensive industries.
(5) How to balance conservation and stewardship of Indiana's
water resources with the opportunity to market Indiana's
water resources to compete for water intensive economic
activity.
Sec. 7. The task force shall:
(1) develop recommendations for the legislative council
concerning the issues set forth in section 6 of this chapter;
(2) prepare a report setting forth the task force's findings and
recommendations; and
(3) not later than December 1, 2027, submit the report to the
legislative council in an electronic format under IC 5-14-6.
Sec. 8. The legislative services agency shall provide staff support
to the task force.
Sec. 9. (a) Each member of the task force who is not a state
2026 IN 1379—LS 6276/DI 150


employee is entitled to receive the same per diem, mileage, and
travel allowances paid to individuals who serve as legislative and
lay members, respectively, of interim study committees established
by the legislative council.
(b) Each member of the task force who is a state employee is
entitled to reimbursement for traveling expenses as provided under
IC 4-13-1-4 and other expenses actually incurred in connection
with the member's duties as provided in the state policies and
procedures established by the Indiana department of
administration and approved by the budget agency.
(c) Each member of the task force who is a member of the
general assembly is entitled to receive the same per diem, mileage,
and travel allowances paid to members of the general assembly
serving on interim study committees established by the legislative
council.
(d) Per diem, mileage, and travel allowances paid under this
chapter shall be paid from appropriations made to the legislative
council or the legislative services agency.
Sec. 10. This chapter expires July 1, 2028.
SECTION 2. IC 14-8-2-61.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 61.5. "County executive", for purposes of
IC 14-25-4.5, has the meaning set forth in IC 14-25-4.5-1.
SECTION 3. IC 14-8-2-118.2 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 118.2. "Ground water
withdrawal facility", for purposes of IC 14-25-4.5, has the meaning
set forth in IC 14-25-4.5-2.
SECTION 4. IC 14-8-2-157.7 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 157.7. "Major ground water
withdrawal facility", for purposes of IC 14-25-4.5, has the meaning
set forth in IC 14-25-4.5-3.
SECTION 5. IC 14-8-2-202, AS AMENDED BY P.L.39-2018,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 202. (a) "Person" means, except as provided
in subsections (b) through (i), (j), an individual, a partnership, an
association, a fiduciary, an executor or administrator, a limited liability
company, or a corporation.
(b) "Person", for purposes of IC 14-12-2, has the meaning set forth
in IC 14-12-2-3.
(c) "Person", for purposes of IC 14-16, IC 14-22-28, IC 14-24,
2026 IN 1379—LS 6276/DI 150


IC 14-26-2, IC 14-28-1, and IC 14-38-2, means an individual, a
partnership, an association, a fiduciary, an executor or administrator,
a limited liability company, a corporation, other legal entity, the state,
or an agency, a political subdivision, or another instrumentality of the
state.
(d) "Person", for purposes of IC 14-12-1, IC 14-12-2, IC 14-21,
IC 14-25 through IC 14-29, except as otherwise provided in this
section, IC 14-33, IC 14-34, and IC 14-37, means an individual, a
partnership, an association, a fiduciary, an executor or administrator,
a limited liability company, a corporation, or a governmental entity.
(e) "Person", for purposes of IC 14-22-31.5, has the meaning set
forth in IC 14-22-31.5-2.
(f) "Person", for purposes of IC 14-25-3, has the meaning set forth
in IC 14-25-3-1.
(g) "Person", for purposes of IC 14-25-4.5, has the meaning set
forth in IC 14-25-4.5-4.
(g) (h) "Person", for the purposes of IC 14-25-7, has the meaning set
forth in IC 14-25-7-5.
(h) (i) "Person", for purposes of IC 14-34, means an individual, a
partnership, a limited liability company, an association, a society, a
joint stock company, a firm, a company, a corporation, or other
business organization.
(i) (j) "Person", for purposes of IC 14-38-1, has the meaning set
forth in IC 14-38-1-2.
SECTION 6. IC 14-8-2-299.2 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 299.2. "Wabash River basin",
for purposes of IC 14-25-4.5, has the meaning set forth in
IC 14-25-4.5-5.
SECTION 7. IC 14-25-4.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]:
Chapter 4.5. Moratorium on New Major Ground Water
Withdrawal Facilities
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "county executive" means the
board of commissioners of a county elected under IC 36-2-2-2.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "ground water withdrawal
facility" means a facility that meets all of the following conditions:
(1) The facility includes:
(A) one (1) well; or
(B) two (2) or more wells under common ownership or
control.
2026 IN 1379—LS 6276/DI 150


(2) The well or wells described in subdivision (1) have, in the
aggregate, from all sources and by all methods, the capability
of withdrawing not more than nine million nine hundred
ninety-nine thousand nine hundred ninety-nine (9,999,999)
gallons of ground water from one (1) or more aquifers in one
(1) day.
(3) Either:
(A) the facility is connected to existing pipeline facilities; or
(B) plans for the facility include the connection of the
facility to pipeline facilities;
through which not more than four million nine hundred
ninety-nine thousand nine hundred ninety-nine (4,999,999)
gallons of ground water withdrawn by the well or wells to
which subdivision (1) refers could be transported in one (1)
day to a destination located at least twenty (20) miles from the
well or wells.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "major ground water withdrawal
facility" means a facility that meets all of the following conditions:
(1) The facility includes:
(A) one (1) well; or
(B) two (2) or more wells under common ownership or
control.
(2) The well or wells described in subdivision (1) have, in the
aggregate, from all sources and by all methods, the capability
of withdrawing at least ten million (10,000,000) gallons of
ground water from one (1) or more aquifers in one (1) day.
(3) Either:
(A) the facility is connected to existing pipeline facilities; or
(B) plans for the facility include the connection of the
facility to pipeline facilities;
through which at least five million (5,000,000) gallons of
ground water withdrawn by the well or wells to which
subdivision (1) refers could be transported in one (1) day to a
destination located at least twenty (20) miles from the well or
wells.
Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "person" means any of the
following:
(1) An individual.
(2) A corporation, including a body corporate and politic
exercising public functions.
(3) A limited liability company, partnership, trust, or
unincorporated association.
2026 IN 1379—LS 6276/DI 150


(4) The state.
(5) A unit (as defined in IC 36-1-2-23).
(6) A board, a bureau, a commission, a division, a department,
an officer, an agency, an authority, or an instrumentality of
the state or of a unit.
(7) Two (2) or more of the persons identified in subdivisions
(1) through (6) acting in concert.
Sec. 5. As used in this chapter, "Wabash River basin" means the
area in:
(1) Tippecanoe County;
(2) Warren County;
(3) Vermillion County;
(4) Fountain County;
(5) Parke County; and
(6) Montgomery County;
that is drained by the Wabash River and the tributaries of the
Wabash River.
Sec. 6. Except as provided in sections 8, 9, and 10 of this chapter,
a person shall not establish a major ground water withdrawal
facility in the Wabash River basin during the period beginning
May 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2028.
Sec. 7. Except as provided in section 9 of this chapter, no person
shall use state funding to plan the establishment of a major ground
water withdrawal facility in the Wabash River basin during the
period beginning May 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2028.
Sec. 8. A county executive of a county located in the Wabash
River basin may adopt an order allowing a person to establish a
major ground water withdrawal facility in the county during the
period beginning May 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2028. However,
if the proposed major ground water withdrawal facility will
withdraw water from or transport water through two (2) or more
counties, the county executive of each of these counties must adopt
an order allowing the establishment of a major ground water
withdrawal facility to proceed.
Sec. 9. The prohibitions in sections 6 and 7 of this chapter do not
apply to an operating ground water withdrawal facility that
increases its current:
(1) withdrawal; or
(2) pipeline;
capability by not more than two million (2,000,000) gallons of
ground water per day.
Sec. 10. The prohibitions in sections 6 and 7 of this chapter do
2026 IN 1379—LS 6276/DI 150


not apply to the establishment or planning of a major ground
water withdrawal facility in the Wabash River basin for which a
contract concerning the establishment or planning of the major
ground water withdrawal facility was entered into before January
1, 2026.
Sec. 11. This chapter expires July 1, 2029.
SECTION 8. An emergency is declared for this act.
2026 IN 1379—LS 6276/DI 150